Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 13

Department Of Parks And Tourism

25-13-102. Acts 1975, No. 496, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-907.1.

25-13-202. Acts 1995, No. 1255, § 2.

25-13-302. Acts 1997, No. 609, § 2.

25-14-101. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning creation, director, organization, and personnel of the Department of Environmental Quality, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3250, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 38, § 8; 1981, No. 834, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-908; Acts 1999, No. 1164, § 183; Acts 2015, No. 1100, § 61.

For current law, see §25-43-601 et seq.

25-14-102. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning hazardous duty compensation, was repealed by Acts 2011, No. 281, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 1191, § 33; 1999, No. 1164, § 184.

25-14-103. [Transferred.]

Publisher's Notes. Former §25-14-103, enacted by Acts 2019, No. 790, §3, has been renumbered as §20-80-312.

25-13-104. Acts 1993, No. 728, § 32; 1995, No. 1038, § 37.

25-13-204. Acts 1995, No. 1255, §§ 4-6; 1997, No. 250, § 236.